Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3 Georgia Coroner’s Training Council

Administrative rules and regulations.

Georgia Coroner’s Training Council, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 112.

45-16-60.
Short title.

This article shall be known as “The Georgia Coroner’s Training Council Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1.

45-16-61.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Certified coroner” means a coroner who has the appropriate required certificate of training issued by the council on file with the Board of Public Safety.

“Coroner” means any person appointed or elected in a county to serve as coroner or deputy coroner.

“Council” means the Georgia Coroner’s Training Council.

“School” means any school, college, university, academy, or training program approved by the council and the Board of Public Safety which offers basic, in-service, advanced, specialized, or continuing training, or a combination thereof, and includes within its meaning a combination of course curriculum, instructors, and facilities which meets the standards required by the council.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-16-62.
Council established; membership; terms of office; curriculum advisory committee; filling of vacancies.

There is established a council which shall be known and designated as the “Georgia Coroner’s Training Council” which shall be composed of the superintendent of the Georgia Police Academy or his designee, which member shall not be a voting member; five coroners appointed by the Board of Public Safety, three of whom will be selected from a list of five persons recommended by the Georgia Coroner’s Association; and one physician trained in forensic pathology and appointed by the Board of Public Safety, which physician member shall not be a voting member of the council but shall advise the council regarding the training course curriculum for coroners. The term of office of the physician member appointed in 1990 shall begin September 1, 1990, and that and all subsequent terms for that office shall be for four years and until the appointment and qualification of a successor. The five coroners appointed shall serve for terms of four years. The term of office of the member initially appointed in 1987 shall begin September 1, 1987. Upon the expiration of a member’s term of office, such member shall continue to serve on the council until his successor is appointed and qualified. Any person, other than the physician member, appointed to the council who ceases to serve as a coroner shall be ineligible to continue service on the council. The Georgia Police Academy shall establish a curriculum advisory committee to provide information beneficial to the development of courses at the Georgia Police Academy. Members of the committee will be selected by the superintendent of the Georgia Police Academy.

Membership on the council does not constitute public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding office by reason of his membership.

Vacancies on the council shall be filled as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section for the remainder of the unexpired term.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 340, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 333, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 4.

45-16-63.
Oath of office; issuance of certificates of appointment.

Immediately and before entering upon the duties of office, the members of the council shall take the oath of office and shall file the same with the Board of Public Safety, which, upon receiving the oath of office, shall issue to each member a certificate of appointment.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45.

45-16-64.
Council officers; quorum; record keeping; annual reports.

The council at its initial meeting, which shall be held promptly after the appointment of its members, shall elect from among its members a chairman and a vice-chairman who shall serve until the first meeting in the succeeding year. Thereafter, the chairman and the vice-chairman shall be elected at the first meeting of each calendar year.

The superintendent of the Georgia Police Academy or his designee shall serve as secretary to the council.

A simple majority of the councilmembers shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

The council shall maintain minutes of its meetings and such other records as it deems necessary.

The council shall report at least annually to the Board of Public Safety and to the General Assembly as to its activities.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 340, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1967, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.

45-16-65.
Powers and duties of council generally.

The council is vested with the following functions, powers, and responsibilities:

To make all the necessary rules and regulations to carry out this article;

To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of every department, agency, or instrumentality of the state government or its political subdivisions in furtherance of the purposes of this article;

To approve schools and to prescribe minimum qualifications for instructors at approved schools;

To issue a certificate of certification to any coroner satisfactorily complying with an approved training program;

To withdraw or suspend the certification of any coroner who has performed or is performing the duties of a coroner in violation of this chapter;

To do any and all things necessary or convenient to enable it wholly and adequately to perform its duties and to exercise the power granted to it;

To review complaints from outside parties and make recommendations concerning the retention, suspension, or removal of a coroner from his or her position; and

To prescribe, by rules and regulations, the minimum requirements for curricula and standards composing the initial in-service, advanced, specialized, and continuing training courses for certification.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 333, § 3; Ga. L. 2019, p. 803, § 1/SB 154.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (6), added paragraph (7), and redesignated former paragraph (7) as present paragraph (8).

45-16-66.
Annual training requirement for certified coroners; fees.

In order to maintain the status of a certified coroner, each person certified as such shall complete such additional training per annum during each year in which he or she serves as coroner as provided by the Georgia Coroner’s Training Council in its rules and regulations, but such training course shall not be less than 16 hours per year. Each coroner and deputy coroner shall file a certificate of additional training with such council.

No person serving as a coroner shall charge or collect any fee, charge, or cost of any kind for his services, including those fees specified in this article, unless such person is a certified coroner.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 333, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1735, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 356, § 2.

Cross references.

Participation in training courses, §

45-16-6

.

45-16-67.
Actions to restrain violations of this article.

On its own initiative or on the verified complaint of any person that a person has performed or is performing the duties of coroner in violation of this article, the council may file an action seeking equitable relief in its own name in the superior court of any county in this state having jurisdiction of such person. Such action shall allege the facts and pray for a temporary restraining order and temporary injunction against such person restraining him from violating this article. Upon proof thereof, the court shall issue a restraining order, temporary injunction, or permanent injunction without requiring allegation or proof that the plaintiff has no adequate remedy at law. The right of injunction provided for in this Code section shall be in addition to any other remedy which the council has.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-67

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 797, § 1.